Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1868.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:

SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be

codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:

This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Oklahoma

Firearms Act of 2025".

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.


60-1-11701 GRS 12/23/24







Req. No. 11701 Page 1